North Dakota statutes. TITLE 29 Judicial Procedure, Criminal
CHAPTER 29-13 Arraignment [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Criminal Procedure]

29-13-01.
When and where defendant arraigned. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-02.
Defendant must be present if offense felony — Counsel may appear on misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 43.

29-13-03.
Arraignment, right to have counsel. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 10, 44.

29-13-04.
How arraignment made. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-05.
Defendant’s true name. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-06.
No other name given. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-07.
Another name given — Procedure. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-08.
Time to answer given defendant — Discretion of court. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.

29-13-09.
Failure to arraign and irregularity of arraignment. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 10.